Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-204
Agreement, defined.

Agreement shall mean any agreement between a wholesaler and a supplier, whether oral or written, by which a wholesaler is granted the right to purchase and sell a brand or brands of beer sold by a supplier.

Laws 1989, LB 371, § 4.